Hawaii statutes.
[§431C-50] Penalties. (a) The
commissioner may levy a civil penalty not exceeding $10,000 and the amount of
the claim for each violation upon any person, including those persons and their
employees licensed pursuant to this chapter, who is found to have committed a
fraudulent life settlement act or violated any other provision of this chapter.

(b) The license of a person licensed under
this chapter who commits a fraudulent life settlement act shall be revoked for
a period of at least one year.

(c) The penalties under this chapter are
cumulative and may be imposed in addition to any other penalties authorized by
law. [L 2012, c 256, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next